Utah statutes.
38-2-6.   Mold liens.

Title 13, Chapter 31, Mold Retention and Lien Act, governs liens on molds in the possession of a molder as those terms are defined in Section 13-31-102.



Enacted by Chapter 349, 1998 General Session

